Alaska, session 34, SB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 * Section 1. AS 47.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 08 Sec. 47.30.843. Minors undergoing inpatient mental health evaluation and 09 treatment. A minor undergoing evaluation or inpatient treatment at a psychiatric 10 hospital has the right, unless it is otherwise prohibited by law or court order or 11 considered therapeutically unadvisable by the professional person in charge, to have 12 confidential telephone or video communication each week for at least one cumulative 13 hour with the minor's parent or legal guardian or other adult approved by the 01 professional person in charge. The psychiatric hospital shall facilitate the 02 communication and may place reasonable limits on the number of calls permitted. 03 * Sec. 2. AS 47.32.030 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 04 (e) The Department of Health shall prepare an annual report regarding minors 05 in psychiatric hospitals and, not later than November 1 of each year, publish the report 06 on the department's Internet website, submit the report to the senate secretary and the 07 chief clerk of the house of representatives, and notify the legislature that the report is 08 available. The report must 09 (1) contain information on the uses of seclusion and restraint reported 10 under AS 47.32.200(g), including the aggregate total of the uses of seclusion or 11 restraint at each psychiatric hospital in which minors undergo evaluation or inpatient 12 treatment, and the type of psychotropic medication used, if any, to carry out each 13 chemical restraint; 14 (2) summarize the department's findings from the inspections 15 conducted under AS 47.32.110(d); and 16 (3) contain data on the number of minors who received residential care 17 at psychiatric hospitals, including information provided by the Department of Family 18 and Community Services under (f) of this section regarding minors in state custody 19 who receive care at psychiatric hospitals. 20 (f) The Department of Family and Community Services shall annually 21 (1) collect data on the number of minors in state custody who received 22 residential care at psychiatric hospitals in the state, the number of minors in state 23 custody who received residential care at out-of-state psychiatric hospitals, and the 24 amount of time each of those minors spent at psychiatric hospitals in each of those 25 settings; and 26 (2) provide the data collected under (1) of this subsection to the 27 Department of Health for inclusion in the report required under (e) of this section. 28 * Sec. 3. AS 47.32.110(c) is amended to read: 29 (c) Upon petition of the department with licensing authority for the entity 30 under AS 47.32.010 and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the entity, the 31 court shall issue an order to an officer or employee of that department authorizing the 01 officer or employee to enter for any of the purposes described in (a) or (d) of this 02 section. 03 * Sec. 4. AS 47.32.110 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (d) A designated agent or employee of the Department of Health shall 05 conduct, at least twice each year, an unannounced inspection of each psychiatric 06 hospital in which minors undergo evaluation or inpatient treatment and in which a 07 minor has spent more than three nights in the preceding year. In conducting an 08 inspection under this subsection, the Department of Health shall interview at least 50 09 percent of the minor patients of the psychiatric hospital. Staff of the psychiatric 10 hospital may not be present during an interview conducted under this subsection. 11 * Sec. 5. AS 47.32.200 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (g) A psychiatric hospital shall notify the Department of Health in writing of 13 each use of seclusion or restraint on a minor, including the use of a chemical, 14 mechanical, or physical restraint. The psychiatric hospital shall notify the Department 15 of Health and the parent or guardian of the minor not later than one business day after 16 the use of seclusion or restraint. The notification provided by a psychiatric hospital 17 regarding the use of a chemical restraint must include the type of psychotropic 18 medication used to carry out the chemical restraint. 19 * Sec. 6. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.